Indiana, session 2026, HB1087.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-21-5-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10. Subject to available funding, the division may
develop an application to provide funds to a school maintained by
a school corporation or a school corporation on behalf of a school
to obtain a federal Food and Drug Administration approved opioid
overdose reversal medication.
SECTION 2. IC 20-34-4.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2023,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A school or a school corporation may:
(1) fill a prescription or statewide standing order for an
emergency medication; and
(2) store the emergency medication:
(A) if the prescription or statewide standing order is filled by
a school, in the school; or
(B) if the prescription or statewide standing order is filled by
a school corporation, in a school in the school corporation;
2026 IN 1087—LS 6474/DI 152


and
(3) work in cooperation with an opioid overdose prevention
organization to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
if a health care provider who is licensed in Indiana and whose scope of
practice includes the prescribing of medication writes the prescription
or the state health commissioner issues a statewide standing order for
the emergency medication for the school or school corporation.
(b) The school shall store the emergency medication in a safe
location in which only school employees have access.
SECTION 3. IC 20-34-4.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2023,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A health care provider who is licensed in
Indiana and whose scope of practice includes the prescribing of
medication may:
(1) write; or
(2) transmit in an electronic format for an electronically
transmitted prescription;
a prescription, drug order, or protocol for an emergency medication for
a school or school corporation.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d), the state health
commissioner or the state health commissioner's designee who is a
licensed prescriber may issue a statewide standing order, prescription,
or protocol for emergency stock medication for schools or school
corporations.
(c) A pharmacist licensed under IC 25-26 may dispense a valid
prescription, drug order, standing order, or protocol for an emergency
medication issued in the name of a school or school corporation.
(d) The state health commissioner or the state health
commissioner's designee who is a licensed prescriber shall issue a
statewide standing order, prescription, or protocol for a federal
Food and Drug Administration approved opioid overdose reversal
medication, including nasal spray, for each:
(1) school; or
(2) school corporation on behalf of each school.
The standing order, prescription, or protocol shall provide at least
two (2) individual doses of a federal Food and Drug Administration
approved opioid overdose reversal medication per school.
2026 IN 1087—LS 6474/DI 152